test/src/lexicon-yamls/intransitive_lexicon.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/fst/lexicon.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/fst/lexicon.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/fst/lexicon.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/fst/lexicon.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Verb - intransitive verb - ok :     # Test for intransitive verb inflection
    #Infinitive
    wa'a+V+IV+Root: wa'a # eat
    wa'a+V+IV+Inf: wa'a>k # to eat
    #Present Tense
    #n-in-wa'a-k
    wa'a+V+IV+Prs+SetB.Sg1:  n{A}{K}<in<wa'a>k    # yo como/I eat
    wa'a+V+IV+Prs+SetB.Sg2:  n{A}{K}<at<wa'a>k  # tú comes/you(singular) eat
    wa'a+V+IV+Prs+SetB.Sg3:  n{A}{K}<<wa'a>k     # él come/he/she eats
    wa'a+V+IV+Prs+SetB.Pl1:  n{A}{K}<oo<wa'a>k   # comemos/we eat
    wa'a+V+IV+Prs+SetB.Pl2:  n{A}{K}<ex<wa'a>k  # ustedes comen/you(plural) eat
    wa'a+V+IV+Prs+SetB.Pl3:  n{A}{K}<e'<wa'a>k  # ellos comen/they eat
    #Future Tense
    wa'a+V+IV+Fut+SetB.Sg1:  t<in<wa'a>q      # yo comeré/I will eat
    wa'a+V+IV+Fut+SetB.Sg2:  t<at<wa'a>q      # tú comerás/you(singular) will eat
    wa'a+V+IV+Fut+SetB.Sg3:  t<aa<wa'a>q      # él comerá/he/she eats #TODO why is third person singular different in future tense
    wa'a+V+IV+Fut+SetB.Pl1:  t<oo<wa'a>q      # comeremos/we will eat 
    wa'a+V+IV+Fut+SetB.Pl2:  t<ex<wa'a>q      # ustedes comerán/you(plural) will eat
    wa'a+V+IV+Fut+SetB.Pl3:  t<e'<wa'a>q      # ellos comerán/they will eat
    #Past Tense
    wa'a+V+IV+Pst+SetB.Sg1:  x<in<wa'a>k      # yo comí/I ate
    wa'a+V+IV+Pst+SetB.Sg2:  x<at<wa'a>k      # tú comiste/you(singular) ate
    wa'a+V+IV+Pst+SetB.Sg3:  x<<wa'a>k        # él comió/he/she ate
    wa'a+V+IV+Pst+SetB.Pl1:  x<oo<wa'a>k      # nosotros comimos/we ate
    wa'a+V+IV+Pst+SetB.Pl2:  x<ex<wa'a>k      # ustedes comieron/you(plural) ate
    wa'a+V+IV+Pst+SetB.Pl3:  x<e'<wa'a>k      # ellos comieron/ they ate
    #NarratiV+IVe Past tense
    wa'a+V+IV+NarPst+SetB.Sg1: k{I}<in<wa'a>k    # yo comí/I ate
    wa'a+V+IV+NarPst+SetB.Sg2: k{I}<at<wa'a>k    # tú comiste/ you(singular) ate
    wa'a+V+IV+NarPst+SetB.Sg3: k{I}<<wa'a>k      # él comió/he/she ate
    wa'a+V+IV+NarPst+SetB.Pl1: k{I}<oo<wa'a>k    # nosotros comimos/ we ate
    wa'a+V+IV+NarPst+SetB.Pl2: k{I}<ex<wa'a>k    # ustedes comieron/ you(plural) ate
    wa'a+V+IV+NarPst+SetB.Pl3: k{I}<e'<wa'a>k    # ellos comieron/ they ate
    #ImperatiV+IVe
    wa'a+V+IV+Imp+SetB.Sg1:  ch{I}<in<wa'a>q      # que coma yo
    wa'a+V+IV+Imp+SetB.Sg2:  ch{I}<at<wa'a>q     # que comas tú
    wa'a+V+IV+Imp+SetB.Sg3:  ch{I}<<wa'a>q      # que coma él
    wa'a+V+IV+Imp+SetB.Pl1:  ch{I}<oo<wa'a>q     # que comamos
    wa'a+V+IV+Imp+SetB.Pl2:  ch{I}<ex<wa'a>q     # que coman ustedes
    wa'a+V+IV+Imp+SetB.Pl3:  ch{I}<e'<wa'a>q     # que coman ellos
    #NegatiV+IVe imperatiV+IVe
    wa'a+V+IV+Neg.Imp+SetB.Sg1:  m{I}<in<wa'a>k  # que no coma yo
    wa'a+V+IV+NegImp+SetB.Sg2:  m{I}<at<wa'a>k  # que no comas tú
    wa'a+V+IV+NegImp+SetB.Sg3:  m{I}<<wa'a>k   # que no coma él
    wa'a+V+IV+NegImp+SetB.Pl1:  m{I}<oo<wa'a>k  # que no comamos
    wa'a+V+IV+NegImp+SetB.Pl2:  m{I}<ex<wa'a>k  # que no coman ustedes
    wa'a+V+IV+NegImp+SetB.Pl3:  m{I}<e'<wa'a>k  # que no coman ellos

    
